Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
CHAPTER 12 Prison Litigation Reform

42-12-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Prison Litigation Reform Act of 1996.”

History.

Code 1981, §

42-12-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 400, § 1.

Law reviews.

For review of 1996 prison litigation reform legislation, see 13 Ga. U. L. Rev. 280 (1996).

42-12-2.
Legislative findings and determinations.

The General Assembly makes the following findings and determinations:

The costs of litigation are rising dramatically. It is the responsibility of this body to seek out and adopt measures to rectify this situation. One source of the rise in litigation costs is frivolous prisoner lawsuits. Meritless lawsuits are being filed at an ever-increasing rate by prisoners who view litigation as a recreational exercise. To address the problems caused by the filing of nonmeritorious lawsuits and to relieve some of the burden placed on Georgia cities, counties, state agencies, the courts, and the Department of Corrections, this chapter is enacted.

Before filing any sort of civil action, all citizens must evaluate the strengths of their claim in light of their own personal financial situation. Private individuals are forced to balance the strength of their case against the reality of court costs, filing fees, and the potential consequences of filing a frivolous or meritless lawsuit. Georgia’s prisoners currently face no such dilemma. In light of the fact that all prisoners’ needs are provided at city, county, or state expense, a prisoner cannot claim that his or her financial status or security would be compromised by a requirement to pay court costs and fees. To address this inequity, the General Assembly enacts this chapter.

In forma pauperis status will continue to allow the filing of an action by a prisoner, thus providing the prisoner with the constitutional right to access to courts. Freezing of the prisoner’s inmate account will hold the prisoner responsible for court costs and fees by seizing any future deposits into the account.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-12-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 400, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “is frivolous” was substituted for “are frivolous” in the second sentence of paragraph (1) and “county, or state” was substituted for “county or state” in the fourth sentence of paragraph (2).

42-12-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Action” means any civil lawsuit, action, or proceeding, including an appeal, filed by a prisoner but shall not include an appeal of a criminal proceeding; provided, however, that the provisions of Code Sections 42-12-4 through 42-12-7 shall not apply to petitions for writ of habeas corpus.

“Court costs and fees” means the initial filing fee set by the clerk of court and all fees incident to service of the lawsuit or amendments.

“Indigent prisoner” means a prisoner who has insufficient funds in the prisoner’s inmate account at the time of filing to pay the appropriate filing fee.

“Prisoner” means a person 17 years of age or older who has been convicted of a crime and is presently incarcerated or is being held in custody awaiting trial or sentencing.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-12-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 400, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 847, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, a comma was deleted following “prisoner” in the introductory language of paragraph (1).

Law reviews.

For note on 1999 amendment to this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 219 (1999).

42-12-4.
Payment from prisoner’s inmate account for costs and fees of action commenced by prisoner.

The following provisions shall apply when an indigent prisoner commences an action:

The indigent prisoner shall pay the current balance of funds in the prisoner’s inmate account;

The clerk of court shall notify the superintendent of the institution in which the prisoner is incarcerated that an action has been filed. Notice to the superintendent shall include:

The prisoner’s name, inmate number, and civil action number; and

The amount of the court costs and fees due and payable;

Upon notification by the clerk of court that an indigent prisoner has commenced an action, the superintendent shall:

Immediately freeze the prisoner’s inmate account; and

Order that all moneys deposited into the prisoner’s inmate account be forwarded to the clerk until all court costs and fees are satisfied, whereupon the freezing of the account shall be terminated.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-12-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 400, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “superintendent” was substituted for “superintendant” in the second sentence of paragraph (2).

42-12-5.
In forma pauperis procedure; contents and service of affidavit; judicial determinations.

A prisoner’s affidavit of in forma pauperis status shall contain each of the following:

The prisoner’s identity, including any and all aliases, and the prisoner’s inmate number;

The nature and amount of any income as well as the source of that income;

Real and personal property owned by the prisoner; and

Cash and checking accounts held by the prisoner.

The affidavit shall also contain the following sworn statement and signature of the prisoner:

Click to view

The affidavit shall contain a copy of the prisoner’s inmate account of the last 12 months or the period of incarceration, whichever is less. The institution shall promptly provide said account information upon request.

The prisoner shall serve the affidavit, including all attachments, on the court and all named defendants.

Failure by the prisoner to comply with this subsection shall result in dismissal without prejudice of the prisoner’s action.

A judicial order authorizing a prisoner to proceed in forma pauperis shall not prevent the freezing of a prisoner’s inmate account nor the forwarding of any future deposits into that account to the court in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

In the event that the court denies the prisoner’s application for in forma pauperis status, the court shall give written notice to the inmate that the inmate’s action will be dismissed without prejudice if the filing fees are not paid within 30 days of the date of the order.

Upon the denial of in forma pauperis status the court shall make a finding as to whether in forma pauperis status was sought fraudulently, frivolously, or maliciously. If the court finds that the in forma pauperis status was sought fraudulently, frivolously, or maliciously, the action shall be dismissed with prejudice, and the court shall assess filing costs.

If an action is dismissed without prejudice and the prisoner refiles the action in substantially the same form:

All filing requirements including filing fees must be met in their entirety; and

No amount paid for court fees in any earlier action or any part thereof shall be credited to the prisoner.

I, , do swear and affirm under penalty of law that the statements contained in this affidavit are true. I further attest that this application for in forma pauperis status is not presented to harass or to cause unnecessary delay or needless increase in the costs of litigation.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-12-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 400, § 1.

42-12-6.
Determination as to whether prisoner’s action frivolous.

Upon the dismissal of a prisoner action or upon the entry of judgment in favor of the responding party, the court shall make a finding as to whether the prisoner’s action was frivolous. The court may award reasonable costs and attorney’s fees to defendants or respondents if the court finds that:

Any material allegation in the prisoner’s in forma pauperis affidavit is false; or

The action or any part of the action is malicious or frivolous as defined in Code Section 9-15-14.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-12-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 400, § 1.

42-12-7.
Deductions from prisoner’s accounts; payment of costs and fees as condition of parole.

Fifty percent of the average monthly balance of the prisoner’s account for the preceding 12 months during which the prisoner’s account had a positive balance shall be deducted from the prisoner’s account and paid over to the clerk of court for each instance that a court finds that the prisoner has done any of the following:

Filed a false, frivolous, or malicious action or claim with the court;

Brought an action or claim with the court solely or primarily for delay or harassment;

Unreasonably expanded or delayed a judicial proceeding;

Testified falsely or otherwise submitted false evidence or information to the court;

Attempted to create or obtain a false affidavit, testimony, or evidence; or

Abused the discovery process in any judicial action or proceeding.

Payment of any past due court costs and fees incurred by the prisoner may be, pursuant to this subsection, a condition of parole, at the discretion of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-12-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 400, § 1.

42-12-7.1.
Payment of fees from prisoner’s inmate account upon filing of habeas corpus petition.

The following provisions shall apply when an indigent prisoner files a petition for habeas corpus:

The indigent prisoner shall pay the current balance of funds in the prisoner’s inmate account;

The clerk of court shall notify the superintendent of the institution in which the prisoner is incarcerated that a petition for habeas corpus has been filed. Notice to the superintendent shall include:

The prisoner’s name, inmate number, and civil action number; and

The amount of the court costs and fees due and payable; and

Upon notification by the clerk of court that an indigent prisoner has filed a petition for habeas corpus, the superintendent shall:

Immediately freeze the prisoner’s inmate account; and

Order that all moneys deposited into the prisoner’s inmate account be forwarded to the clerk until all court costs and fees are satisfied, whereupon the freezing of the account shall be terminated.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-12-7.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 847, § 2.

Cross references.

Habeas corpus, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. 1, Sec. 1, Para. XV.

Habeas corpus, T. 9. C. 14.

Law reviews.

For note on 1999 enactment of this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 219 (1999).

42-12-7.2.
Number of forma pauperis actions limited.

In no event shall a prisoner file any action in forma pauperis in any court of this state if the prisoner has, on three or more prior occasions while he or she was incarcerated or detained in any facility, filed any action in any court of this state or of the United States that was dismissed on the grounds that such action was frivolous or malicious, unless the prisoner is under imminent danger of serious physical injury.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-12-7.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 847, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 42; Ga. L. 2017, p. 673, § 3-4/SB 149.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, near the middle, inserted “or of the United States” and deleted “subsequently” preceding “dismissed”.

Law reviews.

For note on 1999 enactment of this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 219 (1999).

42-12-8.
Appeals.

Appeals of all actions filed by prisoners shall be as provided in Code Section 5-6-35.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-12-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 400, § 1.

42-12-9.
Records of prisoner actions.

The clerk of court shall maintain a list of all prisoner actions along with the disposition of each action and the identity of the judge that handled the action.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-12-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 400, § 1.